en: Cleat receptacle system: Fast Twist 3.0; Large Plastic Thread; Pins; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Small Metal Thread; Tri-Lok; Other
zh-TW: 鞋釘座系統: Fast Twist 3.0; 大塑膠螺紋; 插銷; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; 小型金屬螺紋; Tri-Lok; 其他
ro-RO: Sistem de recepție pentru plăcuță: Fast Twist 3.0; Filet mare din plastic; Pini; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Filet metalic mic; Tri-Lok; Altele
th: ระบบรองรับแผ่นคลีทของรองเท้า: Fast Twist 3.0; เกลียวพลาสติกขนาดใหญ่; พิน; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; เกลียวโลหะขนาดเล็ก; Tri-Lok; อื่นๆ
nl: Schoenplaatje opnamesysteem: Fast Twist 3.0; Grote plastic draad; Pinnen; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Kleine metalen schroefdraad; Tri-Lok; Anders
it: Sistema di aggancio per tacchetti: Fast Twist 3.0; Large Plastic Thread; Pin; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Filettatura metallica piccola; Tri-Lok; Altro
sl-SI: Sistem vtičnic za vpenjala: Fast Twist 3.0; Velik plastični navoj; Zatiči; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Majhen kovinski navoj; Tri-Lok; Drugo
es: Sistema de receptáculos de abrazadera: Fast Twist 3.0; Rosca de plástico grande; Pines; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Rosca metálica pequeña; Tri-Lok; Otro
nb: Klemmebeslagssystem: Fast Twist 3.0; Stor plastgjenge; Pinner; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Liten metallgjenge; Tri-Lok; Annet
sv: Klossfästesystem: Fast Twist 3.0; Stor plastgänga; Stift; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Liten metallgänga; Tri-Lok; Annat
ja: クリート受けシステム: Fast Twist 3.0; Large Plastic Thread; ピン; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; スモールメタルスレッド; Tri-Lok; その他
sk-SK: Systém uchytenia kolíkov: Fast Twist 3.0; Veľký plastový závit; Kolíky; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Malý kovový závit; Tri-Lok; Iné
pt-BR: Sistema de receptáculo da trava: Fast Twist 3.0; Rosca de plástico grande; Pinos; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Rosca metálica pequena; Tri-Lok; Outro
de: Aufnahmesystem für Schuhplatten: Fast Twist 3.0; Großes Kunststoffgewinde; Pins; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Kleines Metallgewinde; Tri-Lok; Sonstige
vi: Hệ thống ổ cắm đinh giày: Fast Twist 3.0; Ren nhựa lớn; Chốt; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Ren kim loại nhỏ; Tri-Lok; Khác
pt-PT: Sistema de recetáculo de cunhos: Fast Twist 3.0; Rosca de plástico grande; Pinos; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Rosca metálica pequena; Tri-Lok; Outro
el: Σύστημα υποδοχής μπουλονιού: Fast Twist 3.0; Μεγάλο πλαστικό σπείρωμα; Καρφιά; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Μικρό μεταλλικό σπείρωμα; Tri-Lok; Άλλο
fi: Klossikiinnitysjärjestelmä: Fast Twist 3.0; Iso muovikierre; Nastat; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Pieni metallikierre; Tri-Lok; Muu
cs: Systém uchycení hrotů golfových bot: Fast Twist 3.0; Velký plastový závit; Kolíky; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Malý kovový závit; Tri-Lok; Jiné
hr-HR: Sustav prihvata za pričvrsne ploče: Fast Twist 3.0; Veliki plastični navoj; Igle; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Mali metalni navoj; Tri-Lok; Ostalo
hu: Stopli tartórendszere: Fast Twist 3.0; Nagy műanyag menetes; Tüskék; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Kis fémmenetes; Tri-Lok; Egyéb
ru: Система крепления шипов: Fast Twist 3.0; Крупная пластиковая резьба; Штифты; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Мелкая металлическая резьба; Tri-Lok; Другая
bg-BG: Система за захващане на клиновете към обувката: Fast Twist 3.0; Голяма пластмасова резба; Щифтове; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Малка метална резба; Tri-Lok; Друго
pl: System mocowania bloków: Fast Twist 3.0; Large Plastic Thread; Piny; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Mały metalowy gwint; Tri-Lok; Inny
da: System til fastgørelse af klamper: Fast Twist 3.0; Stort plastgevind; Stifter; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Lille metalgevind; Tri-Lok; Andet
tr: Krampon yuvası sistemi: Fast Twist 3.0; Büyük plastik dişli; Pimler; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Küçük metal diş; Tri-Lok; Diğer
fr: Système de logement des crampons: Fast Twist 3.0; Grand filetage en plastique; Goupilles; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Petit filetage métallique; Tri-Lok; Autre
lt-LT: Batraiščio tvirtinimo lizdo sistema: „Fast Twist 3.0“; Didelis plastikinis sriegis; Kaiščiai; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; Mažas metalinis sriegis; Tri-Lok; Kita
ko: 클리트 리셉터클 시스템: 패스트 트위스트 3.0; 대형 플라스틱 나사산; 핀; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; 소형 금속 나사산; Tri-Lok; 기타
zh-CN: 锁扣式插槽系统: Fast Twist 3.0; 大号塑料螺纹; 销钉; Q-Lok; Slim-Lok; 小金属螺纹; Tri-Lok; 其他